South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4803.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 5, Chapter 63, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-63-560. (A)(1) Any communication by the Department of Public Health, its divisions, or its contracted entities, that provides information to parents or guardians regarding childhood or school-entry immunization requirements must also include clear and accessible information regarding: (a) the availability of medical and religious exemptions pursuant to Section 44-29-180 and related regulations; and (b) the process by which a parent or guardian may apply for such exemptions, including where to obtain the necessary forms and how to submit them. (2) The Department of Public Health must provide a copy of any communications prepared pursuant to item (1) to the State Department of Education. (B) The exemption information must be included in the same document, webpage, or communication in which immunization requirements are presented. It shall not be limited to separate or hard-to-access resources. (C) This requirement applies to: (1) printed materials distributed through schools or public health offices; (2) digital materials distributed via email, public portals, or websites; and (3) public awareness campaigns, including social media posts, sponsored advertisements, and official press releases. (D) In addition to the requirements of subsections (A) through (C), each public or private school in this State shall, at least once annually, provide written notice to parents or guardians of students enrolled in the school that medical and religious exemptions are available pursuant to Section 44-29-180. The notice must include information on how to obtain and submit the exemption forms and may be provided as part of the school's existing annual communications to parents. (E) The exemption information must be presented in clear, plain language that is easily understood by the general public and may not be obscured or presented in a manner intended to discourage its use. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----